Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1326
Permanent employee; transferred to another agency; sick leave transferred.

A permanent employee who is transferred from one agency to another shall have his accrued sick leave transferred to the receiving agency.

Laws 1973, LB 340, § 7.